Indiana, session 2026, HB1147.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-2.1-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.59-2021,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A first time examination candidate must
have at least:
(1) one hundred twenty (120) semester hours (or the equivalent if
a different grading period is used) of college education that
includes an accounting concentration or equivalent as determined
by the board to be appropriate; or
(2) a baccalaureate degree with a concentration in accounting
or equivalent as determined by the board to be appropriate.
(b) A candidate for an initial issuance of a certificate must have:
(1) at least one hundred fifty (150) semester hours (or the
equivalent if a different grading period is used) of college
education; and
(2) a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or
university acceptable to the board. The educational program must
include an accounting concentration or equivalent as determined
by the board to be appropriate.
SECTION 2. IC 25-2.1-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.85-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. (a) A first time examination candidate
HEA 1147

2
must have at least:
(1) one hundred twenty (120) semester hours (or the equivalent if
a different grading period is used) of college education that
includes an accounting concentration or equivalent as determined
by the board to be appropriate; or
(2) a baccalaureate degree with a concentration in accounting
or equivalent as determined by the board to be appropriate.
(b) The education requirement for initial licensure may be met
through any of the following pathways:
(1) The completion of a baccalaureate degree with a concentration
in accounting, conferred by a college or university as deemed
acceptable by the board.
(2) The completion of a baccalaureate degree with a concentration
in accounting, totaling one hundred fifty (150) hours, conferred
by a college or university as deemed acceptable by the board.
(3) The completion of a post-baccalaureate degree with a
concentration in accounting, conferred by a college or university
as deemed acceptable by the board.
HEA 1147

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1147